Illinois, session 104th, HB1781.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Southwest Regional Port District Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 1855/1)  (from Ch. 19, par. 451)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the the 8"Southwest Regional Port District Act".9(Source: Laws 1961, p. 2993.)